Tennessee, session 114, SB1484.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 40, Chapter 11, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following new section:
(a) The following persons may deposit with the clerk of the court before which
the proceeding is pending a sum of money in cash equal to the amount of the bail, as
provided by § 40-11-118:
(1) A professional bondsman;
(2) A person with bailable interest. As used in this subdivision (a)(2), a
"person with bailable interest" means the defendant or the defendant's spouse,
parent, child, sibling, legal guardian, or employer; or
(3) Any other person.
(b) If a person other than those listed in subdivision (a)(1) or (2) deposits bail for
a defendant and the defendant is subsequently convicted of a criminal offense that
occurred while the defendant was released on bail due to the person's deposit, then any
victim of the subsequent criminal offense may bring a civil cause of action against the
person who deposited the bail to recover for damage to property, injury, or death arising
from the subsequent criminal offense.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it, and
applies to causes of action arising on or after that date.
SB1484
009838
- 1 -